Alaska statutes. Title 12. Code of Criminal Procedure.
Article 2. Victim and Witness Information Confidentiality.

Sec. 12.61.100.
Declaration of purpose.

The purpose of AS

12.61.100

—

12.61.150

is to protect victims of and witnesses to crime from risk of harassment, intimidation, and unwarranted invasion of privacy by prohibiting the unnecessary disclosure of their addresses and telephone numbers.

History.

(§ 13 ch 57 SLA 1991)

Sec. 12.61.110.
Confidentiality of victim and witness addresses and telephone numbers.

The residence and business addresses and telephone numbers of a victim of a crime or witness to a crime are confidential. A report, paper, picture, photograph, court file, or other document that relates to a crime and contains the residence or business address or telephone number of a victim or witness, and that is in the custody or possession of a public officer or employee, may not be made available for public inspection unless the residence and business addresses and telephone numbers of all victims and witnesses have been deleted.

History.

(§ 13 ch 57 SLA 1991)

Sec. 12.61.120.
Disclosure to defense; contacts with victims and witnesses.

The prosecution in a criminal case may not be required to furnish to the defendant personally the address or telephone number of a victim or witness absent a showing of good cause as determined by the court. Except as provided in (b) of this section, good cause exists when the defendant is proceeding without counsel. When a defendant is represented by counsel, the address and telephone number of a victim or witness may be disclosed to the defendant’s counsel, but the court shall order the defendant’s counsel to not disclose the information to the defendant.

If the defendant is proceeding without counsel in a case involving a charged violation of AS 11.41, AS

11.46.300

—

11.46.330

, AS

11.56.740

,

11.56.807

,

11.56.810

, AS

11.61.190

—

11.61.210

, or a crime involving domestic violence and the court finds that the defendant may pose a continuing threat to the victim of or witness to the offense charged, the court shall protect the address and telephone number of the victim or witness by providing the information only to a person specified by the court or by imposing other restrictions that the court considers necessary. When an address or telephone number is released to a person specified by the court under this subsection, that person, who shall be ordered not to disclose the information to the defendant, shall contact the victim or witness on behalf of the defendant, and the defendant shall meet or speak with the victim or witness only in the presence of that person.

If a defendant or a person acting on behalf of a defendant contacts the victim of an offense with which the defendant is or could be charged, the person shall clearly inform the victim

of the person’s identity and specific association with the defendant;

that the victim does not have to talk to the person unless the victim wishes; and

that the victim may have a prosecuting attorney or other person present during an interview.

If a defendant or a person acting on behalf of a defendant wishes to make a recording of statements of the victim of an offense with which the defendant is or could be charged in this or another jurisdiction, or of a witness, the person shall, before recording begins, obtain the consent of the victim or witness to record the statement by clearly informing the victim or witness (1) of the information set out in (c) of this section, (2) that the statement will be recorded if the victim or witness consents, and (3) that the victim or witness may obtain a transcript or other copy of the recorded statement upon request. When recording begins, the person making the recording shall indicate in the recording that the victim or witness has been informed as required by this subsection, and the victim or witness shall state in the recording that consent of the victim or witness to the recording has been given.

If a victim or witness requests a transcript or other copy of a recorded statement taken under (d) of this section, the defense shall prepare the transcript or other copy and provide it to the person whose statement was recorded.

In this section, “recording” means capturing a statement of a person, whether by magnetic tape or other electronic or electromagnetic means.

History.

(§ 13 ch 57 SLA 1991; am § 29 ch 79 SLA 1992; am §§ 17 — 19 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 19 ch 92 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, “AS

11.56.740

” was substituted for “AS

11.61.120(a)(6)

” to reconcile § 13, ch. 57, SLA 1991, and §§ 1 and 2, ch. 64, SLA 1991. Section 1, ch. 64, SLA 1991 added AS

11.56.740

and § 2, ch. 64, SLA 1991 deleted AS

11.61.120(a)(6)

.

Sec. 12.61.125.
Victims and witnesses of sexual offenses.

The defendant accused of a sexual offense, the defendant’s counsel, or an investigator or other person acting on behalf of the defendant, may not

notwithstanding AS

12.61.120

, contact the victim of the offense or a witness to the offense if the victim or witness, or the parent or guardian of the victim or witness if the victim or witness is a minor, has informed the defendant or the defendant’s counsel in writing or in person that the victim or witness does not wish to be contacted by the defense; a victim or witness who has not informed the defendant or the defendant’s counsel in writing or in person that the victim does not wish to be contacted by the defense is entitled to rights as provided in AS

12.61.120

;

obtain a statement from the victim of the offense or a witness to the offense, unless,

if the statement is taken as a recording, the recording is taken in compliance with AS 12.61.120, and written authorization is first obtained from the victim or witness, or from the parent or guardian of the victim or witness if the victim or witness is a minor; the written authorization must state that the victim or witness is aware that there is no legal requirement that the victim or witness talk to the defense; or

if the statement is not taken as a recording, written authorization is first obtained from the victim or witness, or from the parent or guardian of the victim or witness if the victim or witness is a minor; the written authorization must state that the victim or witness is aware that there is no legal requirement that the victim or witness talk to the defense; a victim or witness making a statement under this subparagraph remains entitled to rights as provided in AS 12.61.120.

A defendant who is the parent or guardian of a minor victim or witness may not provide the authorization required under (a) of the section.

If an attorney, or a person acting on behalf of the defendant for an attorney, violates this section, the court shall refer the violation to the Disciplinary Board of the Alaska Bar Association as a grievance.

In this section,

“recording” has the meaning given in AS

12.61.120

;

“sexual offense” means a violation of AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.470

.

History.

(§ 20 ch 64 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 2004)

Sec. 12.61.127.
Inadmissibility of statements taken in violation of AS 12.61.120 or 12.61.125.

A statement obtained from a victim or witness in violation of AS

12.61.120

or

12.61.125

is presumed inadmissible in a prosecution of the defendant. To overcome the presumption of inadmissibility, the defendant must prove by clear and convincing evidence that

the statement is reliable;

similar evidence is unavailable from any other source; and

failure to introduce the statement would substantially undermine the reliability of the fact-finding process and result in manifest injustice.

History.

(§ 20 ch 64 SLA 1996)

Sec. 12.61.130.
Disclosure during court proceedings.

During a trial or hearing related to a criminal prosecution, the residence and business addresses and telephone numbers of a victim of or witness to the charged offense may not be disclosed in open court, and a victim or witness may not be required to provide the addresses or telephone numbers in response to questioning, unless the court determines that the information is necessary and relevant to the facts of the case. The burden to establish the need and relevance for disclosure is on the party seeking disclosure. Before ordering disclosure, the court shall take appropriate measures to minimize the risk of personal harm to the victim or witness that would result from the disclosure.

The address or telephone number of a victim of or witness to a charged offense may not be placed in the court file or court documents relating to that offense except when

the address is used to identify the place of the crime; or

the address or telephone number is contained in a transcript of a court proceeding and disclosure of the address or telephone number was ordered under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 13 ch 57 SLA 1991)

Sec. 12.61.140.
Disclosure of victim’s name.

The portion of the records of a court or law enforcement agency that contains the name of the victim of an offense under AS

11.41.300(a)(1)(C)

or

11.41.410

—

11.41.460

shall be withheld from public inspection, except with the consent of the court in which the case is or would be prosecuted; and

is not a public record under AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.125

.

In all written court records open to public inspection, the name of the victim of an offense under AS

11.41.300(a)(1)(C)

or

11.41.410

—

11.41.460

may not appear. Instead, the victim’s initials shall be used. However, a sealed record containing the victim’s name shall be kept by the court in order to ensure that a defendant is not charged twice for the same offense.

History.

(§ 13 ch 57 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.125

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.125” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 — 09.25.125.

Sec. 12.61.150.
Public and media access.

AS

12.61.100

—

12.61.150

may not be construed to require the court to exclude the public from any stage of the criminal proceeding or to interfere with the right of news media to report information lawfully obtained.

History.

(§ 13 ch 57 SLA 1991)